Nebraska, session 109, LB291.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB291 LB291
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Aid to Municipalities Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Aid to Municipalities Act is to provide
state aid to municipalities in the form of grants which may be used to
pay for infrastructure projects within the municipalities.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Aid to Municipalities Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Infrastructure project means any of the following projects, or
any combination thereof, to be owned or operated by a municipality: Solid
waste management facilities; wastewater, storm water, and water treatment
works and systems, water distribution facilities, and water resources
projects, including, but not limited to, pumping stations, transmission
lines, and mains and their appurtenances; hazardous waste disposal
systems; resource recovery systems; airports; port facilities; buildings
and capital equipment used in the operations and activities of municipal
government and to provide services to the residents of the municipality;
convention and tourism facilities; redevelopment projects as defined in
section 18-2103; and mass transit and other transportation systems,
including parking facilities and excluding public highways and bridges
and municipal roads, streets, and bridges; and
(3) Municipality means any city or village in this state.
Sec. 4. (1) A municipality may apply for a grant under the Aid to
Municipalities Act by submitting an application to the department on a
form prescribed by the department. The application shall include:
(a) The amount of grant funds requested; and
(b) A description of the infrastructure projects to be funded by the
grant.
(2) The department shall consider applications in the order in which
they are received and may approve applications within the limits of
available appropriations, except that in no case shall any grant exceed
five million dollars.
-2-

LB291 LB291
2025 2025
(3) A municipality receiving a grant under this section shall use
the grant funds exclusively to:
(a) Pay for the construction, acquisition, or equipping of
infrastructure projects or portions thereof; or
(b) Pay the principal, interest, premium, and costs of issuance on
bonds issued by the municipality to finance the construction,
acquisition, or equipping of infrastructure projects or portions thereof.
(4) Grant funds received under this section shall be placed in a
separate fund and shall not be commingled with other money of the
municipality.
Sec. 5. The Aid to Municipalities Fund is created. The fund shall
be used by the department to make grants under the Aid to Municipalities
Act and to defray the administrative expenses incurred by the department
in carrying out the act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 6. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate fifteen
million dollars each fiscal year for purposes of carrying out the Aid to
Municipalities Act.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Aid to Municipalities Act.
Sec. 8. Section 13-518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-518 For purposes of sections 13-518 to 13-522:
(1) Allowable growth means (a) for governmental units other than
community colleges, the percentage increase in taxable valuation in
excess of the base limitation established under section 77-3446, if any,
due to improvements to real property as a result of new construction,
additions to existing buildings, any improvements to real property which
increase the value of such property, and any increase in valuation due to
-3-

LB291 LB291
2025 2025
annexation and any personal property valuation over the prior year and
(b) for community colleges, the percentage increase in excess of the base
limitation, if any, in full-time equivalent students from the second year
to the first year preceding the year for which the budget is being
determined;
(2) Capital improvements means (a) acquisition of real property or
(b) acquisition, construction, or extension of any improvements on real
property;
(3) Governing body has the same meaning as in section 13-503, except
that for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, such term shall
not include the governing body of any county, city, or village;
(4) Governmental unit means every political subdivision which has
authority to levy a property tax or authority to request levy authority
under section 77-3443, except that such term shall not include (a)
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less, (b) school districts, or (c) for fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025, counties, cities, or villages;
(5) Qualified sinking fund means a fund or funds maintained
separately from the general fund to pay for acquisition or replacement of
tangible personal property with a useful life of five years or more which
is to be undertaken in the future but is to be paid for in part or in
total in advance using periodic payments into the fund. The term includes
sinking funds under subdivision (13) of section 35-508 for firefighting
and rescue equipment or apparatus;
(6) Restricted funds means (a) property tax, excluding any amounts
refunded to taxpayers, (b) payments in lieu of property taxes, (c) local
option sales taxes, (d) motor vehicle taxes, (e) state aid, (f) transfers
of surpluses from any user fee, permit fee, or regulatory fee if the fee
surplus is transferred to fund a service or function not directly related
to the fee and the costs of the activity funded from the fee, (g) any
funds excluded from restricted funds for the prior year because they were
-4-

LB291 LB291
2025 2025
budgeted for capital improvements but which were not spent and are not
expected to be spent for capital improvements, (h) the tax provided in
sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227 beginning in the second fiscal year in
which the county will receive a full year of receipts, and (i) any excess
tax collections returned to the county under section 77-1776. Funds
received pursuant to the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 for the first five years after a renewable energy generation
facility has been commissioned are nonrestricted funds; and
(7) State aid means:
(a) For all governmental units, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section
77-1239;
(b) For municipalities, state aid to municipalities paid pursuant to
the Aid to Municipalities Act and sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190,
and 77-27,139.04 and insurance premium tax paid to municipalities;
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections
60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and
reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section
29-3933;
(d) For community colleges, state aid to community colleges paid
pursuant to the Community College Aid Act;
(e) For educational service units, state aid appropriated under
sections 79-1241.01 and 79-1241.03; and
(f) For local public health departments as defined in section
71-1626, state aid as distributed under section 71-1628.08.
Sec. 9. Section 13-522, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-522 The Auditor of Public Accounts shall prepare budget documents
to be submitted by governmental units which calculate the restricted
funds authority for each governmental unit. Each governmental unit shall
submit its calculated restricted funds authority with its budget
-5-

LB291 LB291
2025 2025
documents at the time the budgets are due to the Auditor of Public
Accounts. If the Auditor of Public Accounts determines from the budget
documents that a governmental unit is not complying with the budget
limits provided in sections 13-518 to 13-522, he or she shall notify the
governing body of his or her determination and shall send notification of
the noncompliance to the State Treasurer and, if the governmental unit is
a city or village, to the Department of Economic Development notify the
State Treasurer of the noncompliance. The State Treasurer and, if
applicable, the department shall then suspend distribution of state aid
allocated to the governmental unit until such sections are complied with.
The funds shall be held for six months until the governmental unit
complies, and if the governmental unit complies within the six-month
period, it shall receive the suspended funds, but after six months, if
the governmental unit fails to comply, the suspended funds shall be
forfeited and shall be redistributed to other recipients of the state aid
or, in the case of homestead exemption reimbursement, returned to the
General Fund.
Sec. 10. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign sections 1 to 7 of
this act to a new article in Chapter 18.
Sec. 11. Original section 13-522, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 13-518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-6-